Utah statutes.
70A-2-511.   Tender of payment by buyer -- Payment by check.
(1)  Unless otherwise agreed tender of payment is a condition to the seller's
duty to tender and complete any delivery.
(2)  Tender of payment is sufficient when made by any means or in any manner
current in the ordinary course of business unless the seller demands payment
in legal tender and gives any extension of time reasonably necessary to
procure it.
(3)  Subject to the provisions of this act on the effect of an instrument on
an obligation, Section 70A-3-310, payment by check is conditional and is
defeated as between the parties by dishonor of the check on due presentment.
